Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2962.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21-28.11-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28.11 entitled "The
Rhode Island Cannabis Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28.11-6. Cannabis advisory board.
(a) There is hereby established a cannabis advisory board, which is directed to work in
collaboration with the commission and the administrator of the cannabis office to advise and issue
recommendations on the use, commerce, regulation and effects of adult-use and medical cannabis
within the state. The advisory board shall additionally provide recommendations to the commission
regarding the administration and distribution of the social equity assistance fund established
pursuant to § 21-28.11-31 on matters relating to the regulation and policy development of the state’s
cannabis program.
(b) The advisory board shall convene at the request of the commission for the purpose of
considering specific questions or issues identified by the commission, and shall issue
recommendations in response to such requests.
(b)(c) Membership. The advisory board shall consist of eleven (11) voting members, and
eight (8) non-voting members.
(1) The board shall consist of the following non-voting members: the secretary of
commerce or designee, the director of the department of labor and training or designee, the director
of the department of health or designee, the commissioner of education or designee, the
superintendent of public safety or designee, the director of the department of business regulation

or designee, the secretary of the Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS) or
designee, and a representative from the University of Rhode Island College of Pharmacy selected
by the commission.
(2) The board shall consist of the following voting members: a social equity officer
chairperson, who shall be appointed by the governor and serve as chair of the advisory board; two
(2) additional members to be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall represent the cannabis
laboratory testing industry, and one of whom shall be appointed in accordance with subsection (e)
of this section; four (4) members to be appointed by the speaker of the house, one of whom shall
represent the cannabis cultivation industry, and three (3) of whom to be appointed in accordance
with subsection (e) of this section; and four (4) members to be appointed by the president of the
senate, one of whom shall represent the cannabis retail industry, and three (3) of whom to be
appointed in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
(c)(d) Term of voting members. The voting members shall be appointed to serve three (3)
year terms or until a successor is appointed. In the event of vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled in
the manner of the original appointment for the remainder of the term.
(d)(e) Compensation. The appointed members and representatives shall receive no
compensation for their services.
(e)(f) Representation. The members of the advisory board appointed by the governor, the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate pursuant to the provisions of the chapter shall
to the extent possible be individuals with expertise in the following areas: public and behavioral
health, substance use disorder treatment, effective rehabilitative treatment for adults and juveniles,
homelessness and housing, economic development, criminal justice, law enforcement and drug
policy. Further, the advisory board shall include representation from communities most impacted
by cannabis prohibition, such as individuals with prior drug convictions, the formerly incarcerated,
and representatives of organizations servicing communities impacted by past federal and state drug
policies.
(f)(g) Quorum. To take action at a meeting, a majority of voting members of the board
must be present and voting to constitute a quorum.
(g)(h) Role and responsibilities. The advisory board shall:
(1) Consider all matters submitted to the board by the cannabis control commission;
(2) Advise and make recommendations to the commission on the preparation and
promulgation of guidelines, rules and regulations and any changes to guidelines, rules and
regulations that the advisory board deems fundamental or necessary for the commission’s review
and consideration;
LC004961 - Page 2 of 4

(3) Provide analysis and recommendations to the commission relating to the administration
and distribution of the social equity assistance fund established pursuant to § 21-28.11-31;
(4) Conduct all meetings in compliance with chapter 46 of title 42 (the “open meetings
act”); and
(5) Report the findings, analysis, recommendations and conclusions adopted and approved
by the board to the commission within thirty (30) days of adoption and approval.
(h)(i) Subcommittees. The chair may appoint subcommittees in order to develop and
report recommendations and to expedite the work of the board; provided, however, that the chair
shall appoint:
(1) A subcommittee on public health to develop recommendations on: products, labeling,
marketing, advertising, related public health issues; potency, which may include a recommended
maximum limit for individual servings of cannabis products; and packaging, which may include
the development and implementation of a public health warning to appear on cannabis products;
(2) A subcommittee on public safety and community mitigation to develop
recommendations on law enforcement, property, business, consumer, and any other issues that may
have an affect on the locality of the cannabis establishment and the surrounding environment;
(3) A subcommittee on the cannabis industry to develop recommendations on cultivation,
processing, manufacturing, transportation, distribution, seed-to-sale tracking systems and market
stability;
(4) A subcommittee on market participation to develop recommendations on minority and
veteran-owned businesses, local agriculture and growing cooperatives; and
(5) A subcommittee on social equity to develop recommendations on remedying the harm
to individuals directly and adversely impacted by the past enforcement of cannabis-related laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004961
========
LC004961 - Page 3 of 4